Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.703

Programs for intercollegiate athletic competition—Authorized.

The governing boards of each of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community colleges in addition to their other duties prescribed by law shall have the power and authority to establish programs for intercollegiate athletic competition. Such competition may include participation as a member of an athletic conference or conferences, in accordance with conference rules.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 32; 1971 ex.s. c 28 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.